hr-HR: Vrsta ribeža za hranu: Ribež; Električni ribež; Plosnati ručni ribež; Nastavak ribeža za mandolinu; Microplane ribež; Višenamjenski stožasti ribež; Fini ribež; Rotacijski ribež; Dvostrana ploča za ribanje; Ostalo
hu: Konyhai reszelő típusa: Dobozos reszelő; Elektromos reszelő; Lapos kézi reszelő; Mandolin reszelőfeltét; Mikroplane reszelő; Többfelületű toronyreszelő; Érdes reszelő; Forgó reszelő; Kétoldalas reszelőlap; Egyéb
ru: Тип терки: Коробчатая терка; Электрическая терка; Плоская ручная терка; Терка-насадка Mandoline; Терка Microplane; Башенная терка с несколькими поверхностями; Терка-рашпиль; Роторная терка; Двусторонняя терка; Другая
cs: Typ struhadla: Čtyřstranné struhadlo; Elektrické struhadlo; Ploché ruční struhadlo; Struhadlo s mandolínou; Struhadlo Microplane; Víceúčelové věžové struhadlo; Struhadlo typu rašple; Rotační struhadlo; Dvojité struhadlo; Jiné
lt-LT: Tarkos tipas: Dėžutės tarka; Elektrinė tarka; Plokščia rankinė tarka; Mandolinos priedo tarka; Mikroplokštės tarka; Daugiapaviršinė bokštinė tarka; Dildės tipo tarka; Rotacinė tarka; Dvipusė tarka; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de ralador de alimentos: Ralador de quatro faces; Ralador elétrico; Ralador manual plano; Ralador Mandoline; Ralador Microplane; Ralador de torre multisuperfície; Ralador de raspas; Ralador rotativo; Ralador de dois lados; Outro
da: Rivejernstype: Rivejern med beholder; Elektrisk rivejern; Fladt håndholdt rivejern; Rivemodul til mandolinjern; Microplane-rivejern; Rivejern til flere overflader; Håndholdt rivejern; Roterende rivejern; Dobbeltsidet rivejernsblok; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de ralador de alimentos: Ralador de caixa; Ralador elétrico; Ralador manual plano; Ralador Mandolina; Ralador microplano; Ralador de torre multisuperfície; Ralador; Ralador rotativo; Ralador de dois lados; Outro
ja: 食品おろし器のタイプ: ボックスおろし金; 電動おろし金; 平らな手持ちフラットおろし金; マンドリンアタッチメントおろし金; マイクロプレーンおろし金; 多面タワーおろし金; やすりおろし金; 回転式おろし金; 両面おろし金パッド; その他
el: Τύπος τρίφτη τροφίμων: Τρίφτης κουτιού; Ηλεκτρικός τρίφτης; Επίπεδος τρίφτης χειρός; Τρίφτης εξαρτήματος μαντολίνου; Τρίφτης microplane; Πολυεπιφανειακός τρίφτης πύργου; Τρίφτης τύπου ράσπα; Περιστροφικός τρίφτης; Διπλής όψης επιφάνεια τρίφτη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип ренде за храна: Правоъгълно ренде; Електрическо ренде; Плоско ръчно ренде; Приставка ренде за мандолина; Ренде Microplane; Многофункционално вертикално ренде; Ситно ренде; Ротационно ренде; Двустранна подложка за ренде; Друго
tr: Yiyecek rendesi tipi: Kutu rendesi; Elektrikli rende; Düz el tipi rende; Mandoline aparatı rende; Mikroplan rendesi; Çok yüzeyli kule rendesi; Rasp rende; Döner rende; Çift taraflı rende pedi; Diğer
nb: Type rivjern: Boksriver; Elektrisk rivjern; Flatt håndholdt rivjern; Mandoline -tilbehør rivjern; Mikroplan rivjern; Rivjern for flere overflater; Rivjern; Roterende rivjern; Tosidig rivjernpute; Annet
pl: Typ tarki do żywności: Tarka pudełkowa; Tarka elektryczna; Tarka płaska ręczna; Tarka do mandoliny (nakładka); Tarka Microplane; Tarka wieżowa wielofunkcyjna; Tarka zdzierak; Tarka obrotowa; Dwustronna nakładka tarki; Pozostałe
it: Tipo di grattugia per alimenti: Grattugia a scatola; Grattugia elettrica; Grattugia piatta portatile; Grattugia con attacco a mandolina; Grattugia Microplane; Grattugia a torre multisuperficie; Grattugia a raspa; Grattugia rotante; Cuscinetto grattugia a due lati; Altro
en: Food grater type: Box grater; Electric grater; Flat handheld grater; Mandoline attachment grater; Microplane grater; Multi-surface tower grater; Rasp grater; Rotary grater; Two-sided grater pad; Other
fi: Ruokaraastimen tyyppi: Laatikkoraastin; Sähköinen raastin; Litteä käsiraastin; Mandoliiniraastin; Mikroraastin; Monisivuinen torniraastin; Raastin; Pyörivä raastin; Kaksipuolinen raastin; Muu
vi: Loại dụng cụ bào thực phẩm: Dụng cụ bào hình hộp; Máy bào điện; Dụng cụ bào cầm tay dạng phẳng; Phụ kiện bào cho máy cắt mandoline; Dụng cụ bào mịn Microplane; Dụng cụ bào dạng tháp đa năng; Dụng cụ bào dạng dũa; Dụng cụ bào quay tay; Miếng bào hai mặt; Khác
sv: Typ av rivjärn: Rivjärn; Elektrisk rivjärn; Platt handhållet rivjärn; Mandoline rivjärn; Mikroplansrivare; Rivjärn för flera ytor; Rasp rivjärn; Roterande rivjärn; Dubbelsidig rivjärnsplatta; Övrigt
zh-TW: 食物刨絲器類型: 盒式刨絲器; 電動刨絲器; 扁平手持式刨絲器; Mandoline 隨附刨絲器; 小型刨絲器; 多表面塔式刨絲器; 銼式刨絲器; 旋轉式刨絲器; 雙面刨絲墊; 其他
nl: Type voedselrasp: Doosrasp; Elektrische rasp; Platte handrasp; Mandoline rasp-opzetstuk; Microplane rasp; Multi-oppervlakte torenrasp; Rasp; Draaiende rasp; Tweezijdige raspmat; Overig
fr: Type de râpe alimentaire: Râpe à boîte; Râpe électrique; Râpe plate manuelle; Râpe pour mandoline; Râpe Microplane; Râpe tour multi-surfaces; Râpe type zesteur; Râpe rotative; Plaque de râpe double face; Autre
de: Typ der Küchenreibe: Vierkantreibe; Elektrische Reibe; Flache Handreibe; Mandolinen-Reibe; Mikroreibe; Allzweckreibe; Raspel; Trommelreibe; Zweiseitige Reibeplatte; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta strgalnika za hrano: Strgalo za škatlo; Električni strgalnik; Ploščati ročni strgalnik; Nastavek Mandoline strgalo; Mikroskopski ribež; Večnamenski stolpni ribež; Ribež; Rotacijski ribež; Dvostranska blazinica za strganje; Druga
ro-RO: Tipul de răzătoare alimentară: Răzătoare tip cutie; Răzătoare electrică; Răzătoare plată de mână; Răzătoare cu atașament mandolină; Răzătoare microplană; Răzătoare turn multifață; Răzătoare tip raspă; Răzătoare rotativă; Răzătoare cu două fețe; Altele
es: Tipo de rallador de alimentos: Rallador de caja; Rallador eléctrico; Rallador plano de mano; Rallador con mandolina; Rallador microplano; Rallador de caja multisuperficie; Rallador de raspa; Rallador rotatorio; Tabla ralladora de dos caras; Otros
zh-CN: 食物刨丝器的类型: 盒式刨丝器; 电动刨丝器; 平板手持刨丝器; 多功能刨丝附件; 微型刨丝器; 多面塔式刨丝器; 锉刀式刨丝器; 旋转式刨丝器; 双面刨丝器; 其他
ko: 식품용 강판 유형: 박스형 강판; 전기 강판; 평면 핸드헬드 강판; 만돌린 부착형 강판; 마이크로플레인 강판; 다용도 타워 강판; 막대형 강판; 회전식 강판; 양면 강판 패드; 기타
sk-SK: Typ strúhadla na potraviny: Štvorstenné strúhadlo; Elektrické strúhadlo; Ploché ručné strúhadlo; Nadstavce na kuchynský krájač Mandoline; Strúhadlo Microplane; Viacúčelové strúhadlo; Rašpľové strúhadlo; Rotačné strúhadlo; Obojstranné strúhadlo s podložkou; Iné
th: ประเภทที่ขูดอาหาร: ที่ขูดอาหารแบบกล่อง; ที่ขูดอาหารไฟฟ้า; ที่ขูดอาหารแบบแผ่นถือมือ; ที่ขูดอาหาร Mandoline; ที่ขูดอาหาร Microplane; ที่ขูดอาหารทรงหอหลายพื้นผิว; ที่ขูดอาหารแบบตะไบ; ที่ขูดอาหารแบบหมุน; แผ่นขูดอาหารสองด้าน; อื่นๆ